en: Peri-Peri sauces, Peri-Peri sauce
fr: Sauces Piri-Piri, Sauce Piri-Piri

en: Spreads, spreadable preparations, spreadable products, bread spreads, vegan bread spreads
bg: Крем за мазане
ca: Productes per untar
da: Smørbare produkter
de: Brotaufstriche, Brotaufstrich
es: Untables
fi: levitteet
fr: Produits à tartiner, préparations à tartiner, tartinables, produit à tartiner
he: ממרחים
hr: namazi, namaz
hu: Kenhető élelmiszerek
it: Spalmabili, prodotti spalmabili, preparazioni spalmabili
ja: スプレッド
lt: Užtepėlės ir jų produktai
nl: Smeerbare producten
no: Pålegg
pl: Smarowidła, Pasty do smarowania
pt: Produtos para barrar, preparações para barrar
ru: Намазки
sl: namazi, namaz
sv: Bredbara pålägg, Bredbara smörgåspålägg, Smörgåspålägg
tr: Ekmeğe sürülen ürünler, Sürülebilir ürünler
zh: 塗抺食品

en: Spreadable fats
ca: Greixos d'untar
de: Streichfette (Milch- und Nichtmilcherzeugnisse)
es: Grasas para untar
fi: levitettävät rasvat
fr: Matières grasses à tartiner
he: שומנים למריחה
hr: Masti za mazanje
hu: Kenhető zsír
it: Grassi spalmabili
nl: Smeerbare vetten
pl: Tłuszcze do smarowania
pt: Gorduras para barrar
zh: 可涂抹脂肪

en: Milkfat
bg: Млечни мазнини
ca: Greix lacti
da: Mælkefedt
de: Milchfette
es: Grasas de la leche
fi: maitorasva
fr: Matière grasse laitière
he: שומן חלב
hr: Mliječne masti
hu: Tejzsír
it: Prodotti a base di grassi del latte
ja: 乳脂肪
nl: Melkvetten
pl: Tłuszcze mleczne, Tłuszcz mleczny
pt: gorduras lácteas
ru: Молочный жир
sv: Mjölkfett

en: Plant-based spreads, Vegetable spreads, vegetable pastes. Plant-based spread
ca: Productes amb base vegetal per untar
de: pflanzliche Brotaufstriche, pflanzlicher Brotaufstrich
es: Untables vegetales
fi: kasvipohjaiset levitteet
fr: Pâtes à tartiner végétales
he: ממרחים מבוססי צמחים
hr: Namazi na biljnoj bazi
hu: Növényalapú kenhető élelmiszerek
it: Spalmabili a base di piante
lt: Augalinės kilmės užtepėlės
nl: Plantaardige smeerbare producten
pl: Roślinne smarowidła, Warzywne smarowidła, Produkty do smarowania na bazie roślin
pt: Produtos para barrar à base de plantas, Produtos para barrar vegetais, patés vegetais
tr: Ekmeğe sürülen bitkisel ürünler, Ekmeğe sürülen bitki kaynaklı ürünler, Bitkisel sürülebilir ürünler, Bitki kaynaklı sürülebilir ürünler, Sürülebilir bitkisel ürünler, Sürülebilir bitki kaynaklı ürünler
zh: 植物性涂抹酱

en: Vegetarian spreads with meat-like pieces
fr: Tartinades avec des morceaux végétariens

en: Cheese spreads substitutes
fr: Substituts de fromages à tartiner

en: Soy-based cheese spread substitutes, Soy-based cheese spreads
fr: Spécialité végétale type fromage à tartiner au soja préemballée

en: Egg salads substitutes, Egg spreads substitutes
fr: Substituts de salades d'œufs, Substituts de tartinades d'œufs, Substituts de tartinades d'oeufs

en: Vegan products
fr: Produits veganes
nl: Veganistische producten
zh: 纯素产品

en: Vegan vegetable spreads, Vegan vegetable spread
fr: Tartinades véganes aux légumes
hr: Veganski povrtni namazi
nl: Veganistische groentespreads
pl: Wegańskie pasty warzywne

en: Vegetarian vegetable and cheese spreads
fr: Tartinades végétariennes aux légumes et fromage

en: Sweet spreads, Sweet spread
ca: Productes dolços per untar
de: Süße Brotaufstriche, Süßer Brotaufstrich
es: Untables dulces
fi: makeat levitteet
fr: Produits à tartiner sucrés
he: ממרחים מתוקים
hr: Slatki namazi
hu: Édes kenhető élelmiszer
it: Spalmabili dolci
lt: Saldžios užtepėlės
nl: Zoete smeerpastas, zoete smeerbare producten
pl: Słodkie smarowidła, Słodkie produkty do smarowania
pt: Doces para barrar
ru: Сладкие намазки
sv: Söta pålägg
tr: Ekmeğe sürülen tatlı ürünler, Tatlı sürülebilir ürünler, Sürülebilir tatlı ürünler
zh: 甜味涂抹酱

en: Sweet spread variety packs
de: Mischpackungen von Süße Brotaufstriche
es: Paquetes variados de productos dulces para untar
fr: Assortiments de pâtes à tartiner sucrées
hr: Pakiranja slatkih namaza
it: Confezioni miste di dolci spalmabili
nl: Zoet smeerbelegassortimenten
pt: Packs variados de doces - geleias y mel

fr: Crèmes de pistaches, Crèmes de pistache
en: Pistachio spreads
hr: Namazi od pistacija
it: Crema di pistacchio
pl: Kremy pistacjowe do smarowania

en: Fruit curds
fr: Crèmes de fruits à tartiner

en: Lemon curds
de: Zitronen-Aufstrich
es: Crema de limón
fr: Crèmes de citron
hr: Lemon curds
nl: Lemon curds

en: Milk jams, Milk jam, Dulce de leche
de: Dulce de leche
es: Dulce de leche
fr: Confitures de lait, Confiture de lait
hr: Džemovi od mlijeka
it: Marmellate di latte
nl: Dulce de leche
pt: Doces de leite
ru: варёная сгущёнка

en: Wine spreads
fr: Confits de vin

en: Beer spreads
fr: Confits de bière